Massachusetts, session 194th, H1440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The University of Massachusetts at Boston student center shall be
designated and known as the George V. Kenneally, Jr. Student Center, in honor of his years of
service and dedication to the people of the Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. The Chancellor of the University of Massachusetts shall erect and maintain
suitable markers bearing such designation in compliance with the standards of the university.
of 1